src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
< [ t h e y %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  a r e %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a l o n g ] : [ y ī t ɫ ' á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ p e o p l e %  e a c h %  a n d %  e v e r y %  o n e %  a r e %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a l o n g ] : [ y ī t ɫ ' á ɫ "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" "+Distr" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  a r r i v i n g %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g ] : [ n à à t ɫ ' á "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  a r r i v e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n ] : [ n ī n á t ɫ ' ò "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  s t a r t e d %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  s o m e w h e r e %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n á d ā t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r r i v e %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  a r r i v e s %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r r i v e d %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  a r r i v e s %  b y %  r u n n i n g %/ d r i v i n g %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n ] : [ n ì n á t ɫ ' á s h "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  m a k e %  h i m %/ h e r %  r u n %/ d r i v e %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī t ɫ ' á %  g w á y ì y ī l á %- h ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  r e a d i n g %  i t ] : [ y ī z í "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k %  l a t e r %  o n ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a v e %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a v e %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h a s %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h a v e %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h a v e %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h a v e %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h a s %  r e a d %  %( s o m e t h i n g %) ] : [ ī z í "+V" "+I" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a v e %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h a s %  r e a d %  t h i s %  b o o k ] : [ d ī y í %  d á t ɫ ' ì s h í %  ī y í z í ɫ ī "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
